Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0931.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7. (1) An electric utility that has 50,000 or more residential customers in this state, an affiliated transmission company, or an independent transmission company shall apply to the commission for a certificate for a proposed major transmission line. An applicant may withdraw an application at any time. (2) An application for a certificate shall must contain all of the following: (a) The planned date for beginning construction. (b) A detailed description of the proposed major transmission line, its route, and its expected configuration and use. (c) A description and evaluation of 1 or more alternate major transmission line routes and a statement of why the proposed route was selected. (d) A detailed description of the evaluation and selection of the proposed major transmission line's route, including, to the extent applicable, consideration of opportunities to parallel with existing infrastructure rights-of-way or collocate with the applicant's existing transmission lines. (e) (d) If a zoning ordinance prohibits or regulates the location or development of any portion of a proposed route, a description of the location and manner in which that zoning ordinance prohibits or regulates the location or construction of the proposed route. (f) (e) The estimated overall cost of the proposed major transmission line. (g) (f) Information supporting the need for the proposed major transmission line, including identification of known future wholesale users of the proposed major transmission line. (h) (g) Estimated quantifiable and nonquantifiable public benefits of the proposed major transmission line. (i) (h) Estimated private benefits of the proposed major transmission line to the applicant or any legal entity that is affiliated with the applicant. (j) (i) Information addressing potential effects of the proposed major transmission line on public health and safety. (k) (j) A summary of all comments received at each public meeting and the applicant's response to those comments. (l) (k) Information indicating that the proposed major transmission line will comply with all applicable state and federal environmental standards, laws, and rules. (m) (l) Other information reasonably required by the commission pursuant to rule.